District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the "Contractor's Right to Stop Work for Nonpayment Amendment Act of 2025".
Sec. 2. The Private Contractor and Subcontractor Prompt Payment Act of 2013, effective
November 5, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-34; D.C. Official Code§ 27A-101 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code§ 27A-101) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is redesignated as paragraph (1A)
(2) A new paragraph (1) is added to read as follows:
“(1) Billing period” means a payment cycle agreed to by the parties or, in the absence of
an agreement, the calendar month within which work is performed.”.
(3) A new paragraph (2A) is added to read as follows:
“(2A) “Deficiency item” means work performed but which an owner, contractor, or
subcontractor, or any inspector authorized by an owner, contractor, or subcontractor, will not certify as
being completed according to the specifications of the contract.”.


(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code§ 27A-102) is amended as follows:
(1) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
"(d) A contract provision that creates a default by the contractor for suspending work
when the contractor has not received payment pursuant to subsections(a), (b), and (c) of this section, or
has the effect of prohibiting a contractor from suspending work for a violation of this act is against
public policy and is void and unenforceable.".
(c) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code§ 27A-103) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is redesignated as (a).
(2) New subsections (b), (c), and (d) are added to read as follows:
"(b)(l) If payment is not received by a contractor within the deadlines established by §
27A-102 subsections(a), and (c), the contractor shall have the right to suspend performance of any
work, without penalty, until payment is received according to the terms of the contract.
"(2) A contractor may suspend performance for a violation of this act only if:
"(A) The contractor provides written notice to the owner or the owner's
authorized agent, via electronic mail or postal service, stating that the payment is at least 15 days
delinquent according to the deadlines established by subsections (a) or (c) of this section;
"(B) At least 15 calendar days have passed since the written notice in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph was sent; and
"(C) The contractor has provided at least 10 calendar days' written notice, via
certified mail, of the contractor's intent to suspend performance to the owner or the owner's authorized
agent.
"(c)(1) An owner may withhold payment for deficiency items or disputed amounts
according to the terms of a construction contract. Notwithstanding the above, the owner shall pay the
contractor according to the provisions of this act for any items that appear on the invoice or payment
request and have been satisfactorily completed or are undisputed.


"(2) If an owner withholds payment from a construction contractor for a
deficiency item, the amount withheld shall be reasonable and the owner shall notify the contractor of
the deficiency item by a written explanation of its good faith reason within 14 calendar days of the date
that the invoice is received.
"(A) Failure to comply with paragraph (2) shall constitute a waiver of the
basis to withhold payment and necessitate payment of the contractor in full for the invoice.
"(d)(1) If an invoice is filled out incorrectly or incompletely by the contractor or if there
is any other defect or impropriety in an invoice or payment request, the owner shall give written notice
to the contractor within 7 business days of receipt of the invoice or payment request. The notice shall
plainly list any deficiencies contained in the contractor's invoice or payment request.
"(2) Pursuant to § 27A-102(a), (c) and subsection (c) of this section, shall not
apply until such time as the contractor resubmits an invoice or payment request that cures all
deficiencies listed in the notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(c) Section 6 (D.C. Official Code§ 27A-105) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead in language is designated as paragraph (b)
(2) New subsections (a-1), (a-2), (a-3), (a-4), and (a-5) are added to read as follows:
"(a-1) A contract provision that creates a default by the contractor for suspending work
when the contractor has not received payment pursuant to§ 27A-102 subsections(a), (b), and (c), or has
the effect of prohibiting a contractor from suspending work for a violation of this act is against public
policy and is void and unenforceable.".
"(a-2) Any contract provision which creates a default by the subcontractor for
suspending work under the contract when the contractor has received payment pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section or has the effect of prohibiting a subcontractor from suspending work under a
contract is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.".
"(a-3)(1) If payment is not received by a subcontractor within the deadlines established


by § 27A-104 subsections(a), the subcontractor shall have the right to suspend performance of any
work, without penalty, until payment is received according to the terms of the contract.
"(2) A subcontractor may suspend performance for a violation of this act only if:
"(A) The subcontractor provides written notice to the owner or the
owner's authorized agent, via electronic mail or postal service, stating that the payment is at least 30
days delinquent according to the deadlines established by subsection (a) of this section;
"(B) At least 30 calendar days have passed since the written notice in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph was sent; and
"(C) The subcontractor has provided at least 10 calendar days' written
notice, via certified mail, of the subcontractor's intent to suspend performance to the owner or the
owner's authorized agent.
"(a-4)(1) A contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment for deficiency items or
disputed amounts according to the terms of the construction contract.
100 "(2) If a contractor or subcontractor withholds payment from a subcontractor for
101 a deficiency item, the amount withheld shall be reasonable, and the owner shall notify the subcontractor
102 of the deficiency item by a written explanation of its good faith reason within 14 calendar days of the
103 date that the invoice is received.
104 "(A) Failure to comply with paragraph (2) shall constitute a waiver of the
105 basis to withhold payment and necessitate payment of the subcontractor in full for the invoice.
106 "(a-5)(1) If an invoice is filled out incorrectly or incompletely by the subcontractor or if
107 there is any other defect or impropriety in an invoice or payment request, the contractor or
108 subcontractor shall give written notice to the subcontractor within 7 business days of receipt of the
109 invoice or payment request. The notice shall plainly list any deficiencies contained in the
110 subcontractor's invoice or payment request.
111 "(2) Pursuant to § 27A-104(a) and (a-2) of this section, this shall not apply until


112 such time as the subcontractor resubmits an invoice or payment request that cures all deficiencies listed
113 in the notice required by paragraph (a-5)(1) of this section.
114 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
115 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
116 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October
117 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).
118 Sec. 4. Effective date.
119 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
120 action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as provided in
121 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C.
122 Official Code§ 1-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of Columbia Register.